Utah statutes.
59-5-208.   Tax as lien.

The tax imposed by this chapter, together with penalties and interest, is and shall remain a lien upon the mine or mining claim from which the mineral is extracted, until the tax is paid.  In the case of unpatented claims or leases on unpatented ground, the lien shall be upon the mining rights.



Enacted by Chapter 4, 1988 General Session

